Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5666.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 Sec. 13f. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 324 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 324.61511 Pub trst G False oil/gas well affidavit under NREPA 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 324.61521(1) Pub trst G Evading rule under NREPAFalse oil/gas well record 3 324.65114(2) Pub trst F Sequestration permit violation 2 324.65114(4) Pub saf E Sequestration, endangerment 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25) or House Bill No. 5669 (request no. H02796'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 a) or House Bill No. 5665 (request no. H02796'25 a). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 c) or House Bill No. 5667 (request no. H02796'25 c). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02797'25) or House Bill No. 5664 (request no. H02797'25). (e) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02798'25) or House Bill No. 5668 (request no. H02798'25).